Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 8. Size and Weight Limits
§ 31-18-806.
Adoption of greater size or weight limits comparable to federal limits.

If the federal highway administration or the United States congress prescribes or adopts vehicle size or weight limits greater than those now prescribed by the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1956 (title I of public law 627, 84th congress) which exceed in full or in any part the provisions of this article, the department may, upon determining that Wyoming highways have been constructed to standards which will accommodate the additional size or weight, and that the adoption of the size and weight schedule will not jeopardize any federal appropriations to the state, adopt size and weight provisions or schedules comparable to those approved or recommended by the United States congress or the federal highway administration.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 257, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 31-217.7; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-1006

; Laws 1983, ch. 108, § 1; 1993, ch. 68, § 4; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “part the provisions of this article” for “part of this act.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former §

31-5-1006

, effective July 1, 1993.

Federal-Aid Highway Act. —

For present provisions of the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1956, as to size and weight limitations, referred to in this section, see 23 U.S.C. § 127.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 31-18-807.
Special permits for certain combinations of vehicles.

The director may issue special permits, which shall not be in force more than ninety (90) days, authorizing the operation of a combination of motor vehicles on the highways of the state consisting of more than three (3) single units. The permits shall be issued for the purpose of testing the use of such units under actual operating conditions on the highways. The permits shall be issued under the supervision of and under conditions including time, route, equipment and speed determined by the director.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 40, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 37-167.3; W.S. 1977, §

37-8-321

; Laws 1983, ch. 108, § 2; 1984, ch. 46, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

31-5-1007

; Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

§ 31-18-808.
Towing oversize disabled vehicles.

The width, height and length limitations prescribed in W.S.

31-18-802

and

31-18-804

do not apply to damaged, disabled or abandoned vehicles or combinations of vehicles in compliance with W.S.

31-18-802

or

31-18-804

, while being towed by a tow truck or otherwise transported in compliance with regulations of the department. The limitation on the number of vehicles in combination imposed by W.S. 31-18-802 may be exceeded for the purpose of towing disabled or abandoned vehicles or vehicle combinations from highways to the nearest point of safekeeping where the vehicle or vehicles can safely be reduced in size to comply with W.S. 31-18-802 whereby the safety of the disabled vehicle or other traffic will be maintained.

The towing vehicle shall be:

Specifically designed for the operation;

Equipped with amber flashing lights; and

Capable of utilizing the lighting and braking systems of the disabled vehicle or combination of vehicles if the systems are operational.

The highway patrol shall be notified prior to the operation of a combination of vehicles under this section on the highways of the state.

A vehicle transporting disabled vehicles other than by towing shall be equipped with amber flashing lights or be accompanied by a vehicle with amber flashing lights.

The director or his authorized representative may issue a permit, effective for one (1) year, authorizing the movements of disabled or abandoned vehicles or vehicle combinations that exceed the maximum weights authorized under W.S. 31-18-802(a)(v), while being towed by a tow truck or otherwise transported in compliance with regulations of the department. The fee for an annual permit issued under this subsection shall be fifty dollars ($50.00) per tow truck.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 209, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-5-1008; Laws 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 3; 1998, ch. 46, § 1; 2004, ch. 3, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

added (e).

Laws 2004, ch. 3, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2004.